Utah statutes.
78B-3-410.   Limitation of award of noneconomic damages in malpractice
actions.
(1)  In a malpractice action against a health care provider, an injured
plaintiff may recover noneconomic losses to compensate for pain, suffering,
and inconvenience.  The amount of damages awarded for noneconomic loss may not
exceed:
(a)  for a cause of action arising before July 1, 2001, $250,000;
(b)  for a cause of action arising on or after July 1, 2001 and before July 1,
2002, the limitation is adjusted for inflation to $400,000; and
(c)  for a cause of action arising on or after July 1, 2002, the $400,000
limitation described in Subsection (1)(b) shall be adjusted for inflation as
provided in Subsection (2).
(2) (a)  Beginning July 1, 2002 and each July 1 thereafter, the limit for
damages under Subsection (1)(c) shall be adjusted for inflation by the state
treasurer.
(b)  By July 15 of each year, the state treasurer shall:
(i)  certify the inflation-adjusted limit calculated under this Subsection
(2); and
(ii)  inform the Administrative Office of the Courts of the certified limit.
(c)  The amount resulting from Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  be rounded to the nearest $10,000; and
(ii)  apply to a cause of action arising on or after the date the annual
adjustment is made.
(3)  As used in this section, "inflation" means the seasonally adjusted
consumer price index for all urban consumers as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4)  The limit under Subsection (1) does not apply to awards of punitive
damages.
